Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Joint State-County Work Program

§ 47-5-451.
Joint state-county work programs; eligibility; limitations.

There is hereby authorized, in each county of the state, a public service work program for state inmates in custody of the county. Such a program may be established at the option of the county in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421. The department shall also recommend rules and regulations concerning the participation of state inmates in the program.

An inmate shall not be eligible to participate in a work program established in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421, if he has been convicted of any crime of violence, including, but not limited to, murder, aggravated assault, rape, robbery or armed robbery.

The inmates participating in the work program established in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421, are restricted to the performance of public service work for counties, municipalities, the state, nonprofit charitable organizations or churches, as defined by Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, except that the Department of Corrections must approve all requests by nonprofit charitable organizations or churches to use offenders to perform any public service work. Upon request of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or the board of trustees of a county school district, municipal school district or junior college district, the inmates may be permitted to perform work for such boards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 38; Laws, 1992, ch. 317, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 9; Laws, 2008, ch. 364, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 47-5-452.
Offenders to clean up abandoned or neglected cemeteries and public roads of the county.

Upon written request by a majority of the board of supervisors of any county, the Commissioner of Corrections may authorize offenders committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections to clean abandoned or neglected cemeteries of the county or clean public roads of the county. The offenders shall be under the supervision of the department and the department shall establish all proper regulations for the working, guarding, safekeeping, clothing, housing and subsistence of offenders while working.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1996).

§ 47-5-453.
Adoption of regulations and policies.

Each county board of supervisors electing to establish a work program under Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 shall adopt regulations and policies as authorized by the Department of Corrections for joint state-county work programs, including extending the limits of the place of confinement of an eligible inmate as to whom there is reasonable cause to believe he will know his trust. Extending the limits of the place of confinement may include confinement at the residence of the subject inmate wherein the primary maintenance and care of the inmate shall take place, subject to approval by the department and county.

Violations by inmates participating in such programs of any such rules, regulations or policies shall result in the ineligibility of the inmates to participate in such programs, and shall result in the inmate’s immediate incarceration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-455.
Establishment of work camps.

Any county board of supervisors establishing a work program pursuant to Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 may also establish a work camp to be used in carrying out the program, wherein inmates participating in the program may be housed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 47-5-457.
Escapes.

The willful failure of an inmate to remain within the extended limits of his confinement or to return to the place of confinement within the time prescribed shall be deemed an escape from a state penal institution and shall be punishable accordingly.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 47-5-459.
Criteria for public service and private sector work.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the State Department of Corrections and the county board of supervisors shall endeavor to secure public service work or private paid employment for eligible inmates under Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469, subject to the following criteria:

Such work shall not result in the displacement of employed workers.

Inmates eligible for work shall not be employed to impair any existing contracts.

Exploitation of eligible inmates, in any form, is prohibited either as it might affect the community, the inmates, the department or the county.

In those cases in which inmates have been authorized to engage in paid employment in the private sector which has been approved by the Department of Corrections and a county board of supervisors electing to establish a work program under Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469, the disposition of funds received by such inmates shall be allocated by the Department of Corrections and the county board of supervisors. The guidelines to be used in the allocation of such funds shall include consideration of the following:

The cost of maintenance of the inmate in his place of confinement and reimbursement for same to the appropriate person or entity;

The operating expenses and costs incurred by the county or Department of Corrections in operating such a work program and reimbursement to such county or to the department; and

Restitution to any victim of the offense for which the inmate was convicted in such amounts and under such conditions as the sentencing court may have imposed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 40; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1996).

§ 47-5-461.
Earned time credit.

State inmates performing public service work or private paid employment under Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 shall be eligible for earned time credit allowances in the same manner as other inmates confined or detained in state prisons or other state correctional facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 47-5-463.
Passes and leaves.

The Commissioner of Corrections may institute a procedure for granting passes and leaves to inmates participating under Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469, and may grant such passes or leaves in deserving cases, not to exceed three (3) days or seventy-two (72) hours.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 41, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-465.
Status of participating inmate.

No inmate granted privileges under Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 shall be deemed to be an agent, employee or involuntary servant of the Department of Corrections, any county board of supervisors, the state or any political subdivision thereof, while involved in the free community or while going to and from work or other specified areas or while on furlough pass.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 8; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 42, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-467.
Delegation of functions.

The Commissioner of Corrections may designate any employee of the department to do and perform for the department any act or function which Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 empower the department to do or perform.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 9; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 43, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-469.
Provisions cumulative.

The provisions of Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 of this chapter are cumulative and shall not be construed to repeal or supersede any laws directly inconsistent herewith; and it is specifically provided herein that any work program in operation or functioning pursuant to any local law when Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 of this chapter become law may be continued pursuant to such local law and shall not be affected in any way by Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469 of this chapter. The county board of supervisors conducting such program may, however, at its option, convert the program to a program to be governed by Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-469.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 489, § 10; reenacted, Laws, 1987, ch. 384, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 47-5-471
Department of Corrections to make available to requesting counties eligible inmates for participation in state-county work program; counties responsible for transportation and expenses related to housing and caring for inmates.

Upon the request of any county for eligible inmates, the Department of Corrections shall make available for participation in the state-county work program in the requesting county any eligible inmates. Upon request and approval of such request by the Department of Corrections, the requesting county shall arrange for transportation of such inmates from the Department of Corrections to such county. Upon receiving any inmates, the county shall be responsible for all expenses related to housing and caring for such inmates. The Department of Corrections shall not be obligated to pay the county for any costs associated with housing or caring for such inmates, while the inmates are in the custody of the county for the purposes of the state-county work program. Regardless of any eligibility criteria established by the Department of Corrections, no inmate convicted of a sex crime, a crime of violence as defined by Section 97-3-2, or any other crime which specifically prohibits parole shall be eligible for participation in the program. The requesting county may, in its sole discretion, refuse any inmate deemed to present an undue risk to such county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 416, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2018.